New Jersey, session 221, S2009.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A board of education of a school district with a student enrollment of at least 1,000 students that offers a 403(b) plan to school district employees pursuant to section 403(b) of the federal Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. s. 403(b)) shall select a minimum of three financial institutions or pension management organizations to provide services to the 403(b) plan.  If fewer than three financial institutions or pension management organizations are determined to be available, then the board of education shall select the number of available providers able to meet the requirements of this section. b.    A financial institution or pension management organization that provides services to a board of education under subsection a. of this section shall: (1)   enter into an agreement with the board of education that shall require the financial institution or pension management organization to provide in an electronic format all data necessary for the administration of the 403(b) plan as determined by the board of education; and (2)  provide all data required by the board of education to facilitate disclosure of all fees, charges, expenses, commissions, compensation, and payments to third parties related to investments offered under the 403(b) plan. c.  A board of education shall not be responsible for: (1)  any investment loss incurred under the 403(b) plan; (2)  the failure of any investment to earn any specific or expected return; and (3)  the failure of any investment to earn as much as any other investment opportunity or to cost less than any other investment opportunity, regardless of whether the other opportunity was offered to participants in the 403(b) plan. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.